Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Investigations, Hearings, and Compensation for Negligent Acts

49.030.
KRS 49.040 to 49.180 applicable to power and authority outlined in KRS 49.020(5).

KRS

49.040

to

49.180

shall apply to the power and authority of the Board of Claims outlined in KRS 49.020(5).

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 74, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 14, effective June 29, 2021.

49.040.
Exclusive jurisdiction of Board of Claims — Limitation on damage awards — Hearing officers — Official records — Agreed judgment or dismissal if settlement reached.

Regardless of any provision of law to the contrary, the jurisdiction of the Board of Claims is exclusive, and a single claim for the recovery of money or a single award of money shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), exclusive of interest and costs. However, if a single act of negligence results in multiple claims, the total award may not exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), to be equitably divided among the claimants, but in no case may any claimant individually receive more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

Hearing officers, upon the direction of the board, the board chair, or the executive director of the Office of Claims and Appeals shall conduct hearings and otherwise supervise the presentation of evidence and perform any other duties assigned to them by the board, the board chair, or the executive director of the Office of Claims and Appeals, except that such hearing officers shall not render final decisions, orders, or awards. However, such hearing officers may, in receiving evidence on behalf of the board, make such rulings affecting the competency, relevancy, and materiality of the evidence about to be presented and upon motions presented during the taking of evidence as will expedite the preparation of the case.

The board shall maintain the official record of the claim, including evidence entered into the record at a hearing on the claim, and the final action taken on each claim. All records of proceedings shall be public records.

Upon recommendation to the board by the attorney for the Commonwealth, its cabinet, department, bureau, agency, or employee thereof, that a settlement has been reached between the parties to the claim, and upon approval by the board that the settlement is reasonable for all parties concerned, an agreed judgment or dismissal may be entered accordingly, even without a party’s admission to liability.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, §§ 1, 3, par. 1; 1950, ch. 50, § 1; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XIII, § 1; 1958, ch. 52, § 1; 1960, ch. 25, § 1; 1972, ch. 234, § 1; 1976, ch. 326, § 2; 1978, ch. 15, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 279, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 499, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 304, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; renumbered from §

44.070

by 2017 ch. 74, § 4, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 15, effective June 29, 2021.

49.050.
Jurisdiction of Board of Claims as to municipal maintenance of state-owned traffic control devices.

The Board of Claims created by KRS

49.010

is hereby vested with full power, authority, and jurisdiction to investigate, hear proof, and compensate persons for damages sustained to either person or property as a proximate result of negligence on the part of any municipality, or any of its officers, agents, or employees while acting within the scope of their employment by the municipality, or any agency thereof, relating to the maintenance by the municipality of state- owned traffic control devices pursuant to a contract with the Commonwealth.

Claims for personal injury or property damage against any municipality, or any of its officers, agents, or employees while acting within the scope of their employment of the municipality, arising out of negligence in the maintenance of state-owned traffic control devices pursuant to a contract with the Commonwealth, shall be limited and reduced in the same manner as described in KRS

49.040

with respect to claims against the Commonwealth.

It is the intention of subsections (1) and (2) of this section to provide every municipality and agency thereof, and their respective officers, agents, or employees with the same liability protection, restrictions, and reductions when such municipalities and agencies are performing maintenance on state-owned traffic control devices pursuant to a contract with the Commonwealth as the Commonwealth and its agencies, officers, and employees would enjoy if performing the work itself.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 225, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; renumbered from §

44.071

by 2017 ch. 74, § 5, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 16, effective June 29, 2021.

49.060.
Legislative intent as to sovereign immunity in negligence claims.

It is the intention of the General Assembly to provide the means to enable a person negligently injured by the Commonwealth, any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies, or any of its officers, agents, or employees while acting within the scope of their employment by the Commonwealth or any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies to be able to assert their just claims as herein provided. The Commonwealth thereby waives the sovereign immunity defense only in the limited situations as herein set forth. It is further the intention of the General Assembly to otherwise expressly preserve the sovereign immunity of the Commonwealth, its cabinets, departments, bureaus, and agencies and its officers, agents, and employees while acting in the scope of their employment in all other situations except where sovereign immunity is specifically and expressly waived as set forth by statute. The Board of Claims shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear claims for damages, except as otherwise specifically set forth by statute, against the Commonwealth, its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies, or any of its officers, agents, or employees while acting within the scope of their employment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 499, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered from §

44.072

by 2017 ch. 74, § 6, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 17, effective June 29, 2021.

49.070.
State institutions of higher education declared agencies of state government for purposes of KRS 49.060 — Jurisdiction of Board of Claims — Sovereign immunity — Exposure to asbestos claims.

For purposes of KRS

49.060

, state institutions of higher education under KRS Chapter 164 are agencies of the state.

The Board of Claims shall have primary and exclusive jurisdiction over all negligence claims for the negligent performance of ministerial acts against the Commonwealth, any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies, or any officers, agents, or employees thereof while acting within the scope of their employment.

The board shall have primary and exclusive jurisdiction to make findings of fact, conclusions of law, and legal determinations with regard to whether the alleged negligent act was on the part of the Commonwealth or any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies or any officers, agents, or employees thereof.

The board shall have primary and exclusive jurisdiction to make findings of fact, conclusions of law, and legal determinations with regard to whether the alleged negligent act was on the part of the Commonwealth or any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies, or any of its officers, agents, or employees while acting within the scope of their employment by the Commonwealth or any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies.

No action for negligence against the Commonwealth, any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies, or any officers, agents, or employees thereof may be brought in any other court or forum in the Commonwealth except the board unless the board makes a final determination that it does not have primary and exclusive jurisdiction over the claim.

The determination by the board becomes final only after all appellate rights have been finalized or waived.

Any applicable statute of limitations for bringing negligence actions in any court or forum other than the board shall be tolled pending the final determination that the board does not have primary and exclusive jurisdiction of the negligence claim.

No action for negligence may be brought in any court or forum other than the board against the Commonwealth, any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies or any of its officers, agents, or employees while acting within the scope of their employment by the Commonwealth or any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies.

Negligence as used herein includes negligence, gross negligence, or wanton negligence.

The defense of contributory negligence is not a complete bar to recovery of a plaintiff’s claim in the board, and the doctrine of comparative negligence shall be utilized by the board.

Except as otherwise provided by KRS

49.040

to

49.180

, nothing contained herein shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity or any other immunity or privilege maintained by the Commonwealth, its cabinets, departments, bureaus, and agencies and its officers, agents, and employees.

Except as otherwise specifically set forth by statute and in reference to subsection (11) of this section, no action for damages may be maintained in any court or forum against the Commonwealth, any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies or any of its officers, agents, or employees while acting within their official capacity and scope of their employment by the Commonwealth or any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies.

The preservation of sovereign immunity referred to in subsections (11) and (12) of this section includes but is not limited to the following:

Discretionary acts or decisions;

Executive decisions;

Ministerial acts;

Actions in the performance of obligations running to the public as a whole;

Governmental performance of a self-imposed protective function to the public or citizens; and

Administrative acts.

The filing of an action in court or any other forum or the purchase of liability insurance or the establishment of a fund for self-insurance by the Commonwealth, its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies or its agents, officers, or employees thereof for a government-related purpose or duty shall not be construed as a waiver of sovereign immunity or any other immunity or privilege thereby held. Except as specifically set forth by statute, no counterclaim, set-off, recoupment, cross-claim, or other form of avoidance of the claim for damages may be asserted by any person when suit is brought against said person by the Commonwealth or any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies thereof.

Neither the Commonwealth nor any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, or agencies or any officers, agents, or employees thereof shall be liable under a respondeat superior theory or any other similar theory for the acts of independent contractors, contractors, or subcontractors thereof or anyone else doing work or providing services for the state on a volunteer basis or pursuant to a contract therewith.

Any claim against the Commonwealth or its departments, agencies, officers, agents, or employees, or a school district board of education or its members, officers, agents, or employees, for damages sustained as a result of exposure to asbestos before, during, or after its removal from a facility owned, leased, occupied, or operated by the Commonwealth or a school district board of education shall be brought before the Board of Claims.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 499, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered from §

44.073

by 2017 ch. 74, § 7, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 18, effective June 29, 2021.

49.080.
Venue of hearings — Expenses of hearings outside offices.

Hearings involving claimants who are residents of the Commonwealth shall be conducted in the county wherein the claim accrues, provided, however, that the parties may, with the approval of the Board of Claims, agree upon a place not within such county for the conduct of hearings. Hearings involving claimants who are nonresidents shall be conducted in the county wherein the claim accrues, provided, however, that a hearing, with the approval of the board, may be conducted in Franklin County.

When any member of the board is attending hearings at any place other than Frankfort, Kentucky, expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of such duty shall be paid by the state upon certification by the executive director of the Office of Claims and Appeals of an itemized statement of such expenses in accordance with Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 25, § 2; renumbered from §

44.084

by 2017 ch. 74, § 8, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 19, effective June 29, 2021.

49.090.
Investigation of claims — Claims under $2,500 may be investigated in-house — Hearings on contested claims of $2,500 or more — Order — Filing fee.

The Board of Claims may require affected state agencies to investigate claims and the incidents on which they are based and to furnish to the board and the claimant in writing the facts learned by investigation. Such response shall be sufficiently specific to support a decision by the board to pay or deny the claim. If the agency believes the state should refute a claim, the agency shall cite the facts about the incident that support its belief.

If the claim is under two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), it may be investigated by the board in-house and if the board believes it needs additional facts before deciding the claim, the parties may provide the needed information by letter or as directed by the board.

The board shall hold hearings on contested claims whose value is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or greater but may decide claims under two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) without a hearing.

At its hearings, the board, or any of its members, or any of its hearing officers appointed by the board shall hear the parties at issue and their representatives and witnesses.

The award or order shall be made within thirty (30) days after final submission, except in cases involving large or complicated records or unusual questions of law, and shall be made within ninety (90) days after final submission in any event. The order or award, together with a statement of the findings of fact, rulings of law, and other matters pertinent to the question at issue shall be filed with the record of the claim and a copy of the order or award shall immediately be sent to the parties in dispute.

In cases over two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) that have been assigned to a hearing officer or a member, the hearing officer or member shall tender a recommended order to the full board. The final order in any claim heard by a single member or hearing officer shall be made and entered by a majority of the board.

In cases of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less decided by a member, a claimant may make an application for review to the full board within fourteen (14) days from the date of the order or award. If an application is made, the full board shall, as soon as practicable, review the evidence, or, if deemed advisable, hear the parties at issue, their representatives and witnesses, and shall make an order or award and file it as specified in subsection (5) above.

The Office of Claims and Appeals may promulgate an administrative regulation authorizing a filing fee of no more than two hundred dollars ($200) for all appeals that are brought before the Board of Tax Appeals and the Board of Claims.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 25, § 3; 1978, ch. 299, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 355, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 304, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; renumbered from §

44.086

by 2017 ch. 74, § 9, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 20, effective June 29, 2021.

49.100.
Defense to claims.

The attorneys appointed by the Governor to represent the Commonwealth’s cabinets, departments, bureaus, agencies, or officers, agents, or employees thereof may present any opposition the Commonwealth or any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, agencies, or officers, agents, or employees thereof may have to the allowance of any claim filed with the Board of Claims. If such attorney is unavailable to represent his respective cabinet, department, bureau, agency, or employee thereof, then the Attorney General, either by regular or special assignment, shall designate one (1) of his assistants to present any opposition the Commonwealth or any of its cabinets, departments, bureaus, agencies, or officers, agents, or employees thereof may have to the allowance of any claim filed with the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 6; 1950, ch. 50, § 2; 1986, ch. 499, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered from §

44.090

by 2017 ch. 74, § 10, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 21, effective June 29, 2021.

49.110.
Compensation and expenses of Board of Claims, assistant Attorneys General, or attorneys appointed by Governor — Payment of awards — Operating costs paid out of general fund.

The assistant Attorneys General or attorneys appointed by the Governor to represent the Commonwealth’s cabinets, departments, agencies or employees, agents, or officers thereof, assigned to defend claims filed with the Board of Claims shall receive no additional compensation for the performance of their duties before the board; provided, however, members of the board, assistant Attorneys General, and all employees acting for the board shall be recompensed for all necessary and actual expenses they may incur incident to their duties for or before the commission.

All awards and cost of operation assessed by the commission against the Department of Highways shall be paid out of the state road fund upon warrants drawn by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon the State Treasurer.

All awards and costs of operation assessed by the board against other cabinets or agencies of the state, which are not maintained by appropriations out of the general fund, shall be paid out of the funds created or collected for the maintenance and operation of such cabinets or agencies respectively, upon warrants drawn by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon the State Treasurer.

All amounts necessary to pay awards and costs of operation assessed by the board against all other cabinets or agencies of the Commonwealth shall be paid out of the general fund of the Commonwealth, upon warrants drawn by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet upon the State Treasurer.

The executive director of the board shall maintain accurate records reflecting the costs incident to the operation of the board. At the close of each quarter-year period, he shall summarize the cost and shall bill each cabinet, commission, board, or agency which has had cases before the board for a pro-rata share of the cost of operation for the appropriate calendar quarter computed in a manner deemed just and equitable by the board. Each cabinet, commission, board, or agency shall remit quarterly their share of the cost of operation to the board in the manner provided by law.

The board shall have the power and authority to determine the right of any successful party to an action before it to recover from the opposing party the costs incurred by him or it in such action; and such decision shall not be subject to appeal. Costs shall not include attorneys’ fees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, §§ 7, 8; 1950, ch. 50, § 3; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XIII, § 2; 1958, ch. 52, § 2; 1960, ch. 25, § 5; 1986, ch. 499, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered from §

44.100

by 2017 ch. 74, § 11, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 22, effective June 29, 2021.

49.120.
When claims must be presented.

All claims must be filed with the board within one (1) year from the time the claim for relief accrued.

The claim for relief shall be deemed to accrue at the time of the negligent act with regard to property damage.

The claim for relief for personal injury shall be deemed to accrue at the time the personal injury is first discovered by the claimant or in the exercise of reasonable care should have been discovered; however, no action for personal injury shall be commenced beyond two (2) years from the date on which the alleged negligent act or omission actually occurred.

Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the claim for relief for medical malpractice shall be deemed to accrue at the time the personal injury is first discovered by the claimant or in the exercise of reasonable care should have been discovered; however, no action for personal injury as a result of medical malpractice shall be commenced beyond three (3) years from the date on which the alleged negligent act or omission of malpractice actually occurred.

If at the time the alleged negligent act or omission occurred or if at the time the claim for relief accrued or thereafter, the claimant is an infant or of unsound mind or under any other legal disability to file suit, a guardian or next friend or committee or other qualified representative shall bring such action in the board on behalf of such person within the same time limitation set forth herein or the claim is barred, notwithstanding KRS

413.170

and

413.280

. If there is no guardian or committee or he is unwilling or unable to act or is himself a claimant, the board shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of the claimant under legal disability. The board shall allow the guardian ad litem a reasonable fee for his services, to be taxed as costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 3(a); 1950, ch. 50, § 4; 1958, ch. 52, § 5; 1962, ch. 304, § 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 53; 1986, ch. 499, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 176, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; renumbered from §

44.110

by 2017 ch. 74, § 12, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 23, effective June 29, 2021.

49.130.
Conditions of awards — Reduction of award.

An award shall be made only after consideration of the facts surrounding the matter in controversy, and no award shall be made unless the Board of Claims is of the opinion that the damage claimed was caused by such negligence on the part of the Commonwealth or its agents as would entitle claimant to a judgment in an action at law if the state were amenable to such action.

Furthermore, any damage claim awarded shall be reduced by the amount of payments received or the right to receive payment from workers’ compensation insurance, Social Security programs, or other federal, state, or private programs designed to supplement income or pay claimant’s expenses or damages incurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 2; 1950, ch. 50, § 5; 1960, ch. 25, § 6; renumbered from §

44.120

by 2017 ch. 74, § 13, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 24, effective June 29, 2021.

49.140.
Enforcement and entry of orders, awards, and judgments.

Orders, awards, and judgments of the Board of Claims may be enforced by filing in the office of the clerk of the Franklin Circuit Court an authenticated copy of the order, award, or judgment, which, when ordered entered by the judge of the court, shall be entered on the order book and become to all effects and purposes an order, award, or judgment of the court, and be enforceable in a like manner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 4; renumbered from §

44.130

by 2017 ch. 74, § 14, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 25, effective June 29, 2021.

49.150.
Appeal from award of Board of Claims.

Appeals may be taken by a state agency from all awards of the Board of Claims where the amount in controversy, exclusive of interest and costs, is more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). Appeals shall be taken to the Circuit Court of the county wherein the hearing was conducted, provided, however, that an appeal involving a nonresident claimant may be taken by a state agency to the Franklin Circuit Court. Appeals shall be taken within thirty (30) days from the rendition of the award, and the method of appeals shall follow as nearly as may be the rules of civil procedure, except the Commonwealth shall not be required to execute bond.

Any claimant whose claim is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or greater may within thirty (30) days after receipt of the copy of the report containing the final decision of the board, file a proceeding in the Circuit Court of the county wherein the hearing was conducted to review the decision of the board. A copy of the filing and complaint shall be served on the Attorney General in the manner provided by the rules of civil procedure.

The board, the state agency, and the claimant shall be necessary parties to such appeals. It shall not be necessary for the board to file responsive pleadings unless it so desires.

The executive director of the Office of Claims and Appeals shall within thirty (30) days after service of the summons file the entire original record, with the clerk of the Circuit Court, after certifying that such record is the entire original record of the Board of Claims and such record shall be considered by the Circuit Court in its review. If either party requests a transcript of the evidence in writing, the requesting party shall bear the cost of the original copy of the transcript and it shall be furnished within ninety (90) days from the date of the written request.

On appeal no new evidence may be introduced, except as to fraud or misconduct of some person engaged in the hearing before the board. The court sitting without a jury shall hear the cause upon the record before it, and dispose of the appeal in a summary manner, being limited to determining: Whether or not the board acted without or in excess of its powers; the award was procured by fraud; the award is not in conformity to the provisions of KRS

49.040

to

49.180

; and whether the findings of fact support the award. The court shall enter its findings on the order book as a judgment of the court, and such judgment shall have the same effect and be enforceable as any other judgment of the court in civil causes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 9; 1958, ch. 52, § 3; 1960, ch. 25, § 7; 1980, ch. 291, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 355, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 310, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 304, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; renumbered from §

44.140

by 2017 ch. 74, § 15, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 26, effective June 29, 2021.

49.160.
Appeal to Court of Appeals.

Appeals may be taken to the Court of Appeals under the same conditions and under the same practice as appeals are taken from judgments in civil causes rendered by the Circuit Court, but no motion for a new trial or bill of exceptions shall be necessary. The Court of Appeals shall review only the matters subject to review by the Circuit Court and also errors of law arising in the Circuit Court and made reviewable by the Rules of Civil Procedure, where not in conflict with KRS

49.040

to

49.180

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 189, § 10; renumbered from §

44.150

by 2017 ch. 74, § 16, effective June 29, 2017.

49.170.
Exclusiveness of Board of Claims’ award or judgment.

Any action prosecuted to award, judgment, or final decision, including dismissal, under the provisions of KRS

49.040

to

49.180

shall preclude the right of a claimant to sue the Commonwealth, its cabinets, departments, bureaus, and agencies, and its officers, agents, or employees in the Board of Claims or any other forum, except as provided in KRS 49.070(5) when the board determines that it has no jurisdiction over the claim.

The final determination of the board shall be given the same res judicata and collateral estoppel effect as any other judicial determination; and , if entered as provided in KRS

49.140

, it shall be granted the full faith and credit given to judgments from the Commonwealth’s courts in this state and the courts of the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 189, § 3(b); 1950, ch. 50, § 6; 1958, ch. 52, § 4; 1986, ch. 499, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered from §

44.160

by 2017 ch. 74, § 17, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 27, effective June 29, 2021.

49.180.
Monetary threshold for claims brought before Board of Claims.

No claim shall be brought before the Board of Claims unless the value of the total amount of damages claimed therein is two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or greater.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 304, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; renumbered from §

44.165

by 2017 ch. 74, § 18, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 28, effective June 29, 2021.